Wisconsin, session 2025, SB962.
do enact as follows:SB962,11Section 1. 23.176 of the statutes is created to read:SB962,2,2223.176 Bicycling permit. (1) Definitions. In this section:SB962,2,33(a) “Highway” has the meaning given in s. 340.01 (22).SB962,2,64(b) “Proof” means the original bicycling permit or temporary bicycling permit 5receipt issued by the department or an agent appointed under sub. (3) (d) 2. or any 6alternative form of proof designated by rule under s. 23.47 (1).SB962,2,107(c) “Temporary bicycling permit receipt” means a receipt issued by the 8department or an agent under sub. (3) (d) 2. that shows that an application and the 9required fees under sub. (4) for a bicycling permit have been submitted to the 10department or an agent appointed under sub. (3) (d) 2.SB962,2,1111(d) “Vehicle admission area” has the meaning given in s. 27.01 (7) (a) 3.SB962,3,212(2) Permit required. (a) Except as provided in par. (b), no person may travel 13by bicycle on a groomed mountain biking trail or other trail that is open for the use 14of bicycles on land owned by the state, excluding a highway and a vehicle admission 15area, unless a bicycling permit issued under this section is permanently affixed in a 16highly visible location on the forward half of the bicycle or the person is carrying 1proof of a valid temporary bicycling permit receipt, which the person shall exhibit to 2the department or its wardens or other law enforcement officers on demand.SB962,3,43(b) A person is not required to have a bicycle permit under par. (a) in order to 4bicycle on a trail on land owned by the state if any of the following apply:SB962,3,651. The person is authorized to bicycle on the trail as part of an organized and 6authorized event.SB962,3,872. The person is authorized to bicycle on a state trail under a trail pass issued 8by the department under s. 23.175.SB962,3,109(c) A bicycling permit issued under this section does not authorize a person to 10bicycle in an area on land owned by the state where bicycling is prohibited.SB962,3,1711(3) Issuance. (a) The department shall issue a bicycling permit and a 12temporary bicycling permit receipt to a person who applies for the permit and who 13pays the fees required under sub. (4). The application for a bicycling permit shall be 14on the form and contain the information required by the department. The 15department or an agent appointed under par. (d) 2. may not issue a bicycling permit 16or a temporary bicycling permit receipt to the applicant until the applicant complies 17with the requirements specified in this paragraph.SB962,3,1918(b) A bicycling permit issued under this section is valid for the calendar year 19in which it is issued.SB962,3,2120(c) The department shall prepare, procure the printing of, and supply all 21necessary forms for applications and bicycling permits issued under this section.SB962,3,2322(d) In the course of issuing bicycling permits and temporary bicycling permit 23receipts under this section, the department may do any of the following:SB962,4,211. Directly issue the bicycling permits and temporary bicycling permit 2receipts.SB962,4,532. Appoint persons who are not employees of the department to issue the 4bicycling permits and temporary bicycling permit receipts as agents of the 5department.SB962,4,76(e) The department may promulgate rules regulating the activities of persons 7who are authorized as agents under par. (d) 2.SB962,4,98(4) Fees. (a) A person who applies for a bicycling permit under this section 9shall pay one of the following fees to the department, whichever is applicable:SB962,4,10101. For an adult, $40.SB962,4,11112. For a child 12 years of age or older, $20.SB962,4,12123. For a child under the age of 12, $0.SB962,4,2013(b) Any person, including the department, that issues a bicycling permit or 14temporary bicycling permit receipt under this section to a person 12 years of age or 15older shall collect, in addition to the applicable fee under par. (a), an issuing fee of 1675 cents. An agent appointed under sub. (3) (d) 2. may retain 50 cents of each 17issuing fee to compensate the agent for the agent’s services in issuing the 18temporary bicycling permit receipt. Any issuing fee collected by an employee of the 19department shall be remitted to the department together with the fee under par. 20(a).SB962,221Section 2. 23.47 (1) (e) of the statutes is created to read:SB962,4,232223.47 (1) (e) A bicycling permit or a temporary bicycling permit receipt under 23s. 23.176.SB962,4,2424